Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1103
Applicable percentage, defined.

Applicable percentage means
zero percent for the first two credit allowance dates, seven percent for the
third credit allowance date, and eight percent for the next four credit allowance
dates.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 3.